District of Columbia statutes.
2-904

Transferred

District of Columbia Office of Energy; energy conservation plan; facilities energy management plan; emergency energy shortage contingency plan; energy research and development program.

Recodified as § 8-171.04.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-132, § 5, 28 DCR 445
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 125, 47 DCR 520
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 402, 54 DCR 794